West Virginia, session 2025, SB708.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 1. Office of Miners' Health, Safety, and Training; Administration; Enforcement. §22A-1-10a. Salary increase for state mine inspectors and other inspectors. State mine inspectors, including electrical inspectors, underground mine inspectors, surface mine inspectors, and any other class of inspector described in this chapter, shall receive a $4,000 salary increase on the effective date of this section. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home